fxpp/enhufxpp.lexc
LEXICON Ellen
ellen+FXPP+1N1P:ellenem #;
ellen+FXPP+P1N1P:énellenem #;
ellen+FXPP+1N2P:ellened #;
ellen+FXPP+P1N2P:teellened #;
ellen+FXPP+1N3P:ellene #;
ellen+FXPP+1N3P:ellen #;
ellen+FXPP+P1N3P:őellene #;
ellen+FXPP+2N1P:ellenünk #;
ellen+FXPP+P2N1P:miellenünk #;
ellen+FXPP+2N2P:ellenetek #;
ellen+FXPP+P2N2P:tiellenetek #;
ellen+FXPP+2N3P:ellenük #;
ellen+FXPP+P2N3P:őellenük #;

LEXICON Vegett
végett+FXPP+1N1P:végettem #;
végett+FXPP+P1N1P:énvégettem #;
végett+FXPP+1N2P:végetted #;
végett+FXPP+P1N2P:tevégetted #;
végett+FXPP+1N3P:végette #;
végett+FXPP+1N3P:végett #;
végett+FXPP+P1N3P:ővégette #;
végett+FXPP+2N1P:végettünk #;
végett+FXPP+P2N1P:mivégettünk #;
végett+FXPP+2N2P:végettetek #;
végett+FXPP+P2N2P:tivégettetek #;
végett+FXPP+2N3P:végettük #;
végett+FXPP+P2N3P:ővégettük #;


!LEXICON AllFxpp
!alá
!alatt
!alól
!által
!belé
!belől
!ben
!elé
!elébe
!elejbe
!elejbé
!elibe
!elibé
!ellen
!elől*
!előtt
!érett
!ért
!felé
!felett
!felől
!fölibe
!fölibé
!fölött
!helyett
!hoz
!iránt
!kívül
!köré
!körött
!körül
!körülött
!közé
!közibe
!közibé
!között
!közt
!közül
!mellé
!mellett
!mellől
!miatt
!mögé
!mögött
!mögül
!nál
!nek
!nék
!nélkül
!rá
!rajta
!reá
!ról
!szerinte
!t
!től
!után
!vel
!véle
